District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.73

Operating motor vehicle when license suspended or revoked.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 138, ch. 222, § 73
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 957, Pub. L. 85-792, § 14
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 11(b), 29 DCR 3138

History

1981 Ed., § 40-473.
1973 Ed., § 40-489.

Prior Codifications